Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 155 of Title 52, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Agricultural land” means land currently used or recently


used for the purpose of farming, grazing, or ranching;


2. “Best environmental practices” means activities approved by


the Corporation Commission that include, but are not limited to:


a. reduced pad footprint and consolidated well pads,


b. produced water recycling or reuse,

Req. No. 3089 Page 1


c. use of closed-loop drilling systems,


d. topsoil preservation and rapid interim reclamation,


e. livestock-compatible fencing and site design, and


f. protection of riparian buffers;


3. “Operator” means any person authorized by the Corporation


Commission to drill, complete, and operate a well for the intended


development and production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons,


regardless of whether the well is completed or produces; and


4. “Produced water” means formation water, brine, flowback, or


other wastewater produced in connection with oil and gas


development.


B. The Corporation Commission shall levy an annual surface


impact fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per acre for any surface


disturbance associated with oil and gas operations on agricultural


land. The fee shall be applied from the date of initial disturbance


until the date the Corporation Commission certifies successful


reclamation. No fee shall be assessed on acres restored to


agriculture use within twelve (12) months or acres used for multi-


use grazing under an approved surface-use conservation plan.


C. The Corporation Commission shall levy a produced water


impact fee of one cent ($0.01) per barrel on any produced water


generated within this state. Operators may deduct volumes of


produced water that is recycled and reused for drilling or


completion, is treated and beneficially reused for agricultural or

Req. No. 3089 Page 2


industrial purposes, or is disposed of in disposal wells that


utilize advanced seismicity-reduction practices as determined by the


Corporation Commission. Recycled water volumes shall receive an


additional credit of fifty percent (50%) per barrel.


D. 1. An operator shall be eligible for a surface stewardship


credit of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the surface impact fee


if the operator implements best environmental practices that are


certified by the Corporation Commission to include, but not be


limited to:


a. interim reclamation completed within six (6) months of


well completion,


b. a reduced pad footprint, to be less than three (3)


acres for horizontally drilled wells,


c. pollinator-friendly reclamation seed mixes, and


d. consolidated production facilities to reduce surface


footprint by at least forty percent (40%).


2. An operator shall be eligible for a water stewardship credit


of up to seventy-five percent (75%) of produced water fees if the


operator:


a. recycles or reuses more than fifty percent (50%) of


produced water generated,


b. invests in regional water recycling hubs or


cooperative reuse networks, and


c. demonstrates an annual reduction in disposal volumes.

Req. No. 3089 Page 3


E. The Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 155.1 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Corporation Commission to be designated the “Water and


Agricultural Protection Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Corporation Commission from


fees collected pursuant to this act, federal grants, private


contributions, and legislative appropriations provided for the


purpose of testing groundwater and rural drinking water systems in


connection with a pollution concern that stems from a well,


restoring soil and land for farms and ranches affected by oil and


gas operations, plugging and reclaiming abandoned wells, providing


technical assistance programs, and creating water recycling research


programs. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Corporation


Commission for the purpose provided for in this section.


Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the


State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.

Req. No. 3089 Page 4


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3089 CN 1/8/2026 2:11:59 PM











































Req. No. 3089 Page 5